Hawaii, session 2025, GM1219.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The purpose of this Act is to establish the
veterans cemeteries board, composed of representatives from
federal, state, and county departments and agencies, to provide
veterans cemeteries in the State with guidance, education,
technical assistance, and other support to ensure compliance
with standards set by the National Cemetery Administration of
the United States Department of Veterans Affairs.
SECTION 2. Chapter 363, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated
and to read as follows:
'' §363- Veterans cemeteries board. (a) There shall be
established the veterans cemeteries board within the office in
the department of defense for administrative purposes only. The
veterans cemeteries board shall:
(1) Identify compliance issues faced by veterans
cemeteries in the State, the resources needed, and the
challenges encountered by departments or agencies that
2025-2763 SB1377 CDl SMA.docx
iiiiiniiiiiiHiiiiiiiiiiii

Page 2
S.B. NO. E
C.D. 1
manage veterans cemeteries, and work collaboratively
to resolve any issues;
(2) Devise solutions to address the issues identified in
paragraph (1) and implement the solutions
collaboratively with the state and county departments
and agencies represented on the board;
(3) Seek resources, including funding, legislative
initiatives, and intergovernmental program support;
and
(4) Interact with and invite interested community
agencies, organizations, stakeholders, and veterans
and citizens to participate in discussions and board
meetings.
(b) The veterans cemeteries board shall consist of the
following members:
(1) The director, or the director's designee, who shall
serve as the chairperson of the board;
(2) A representative of the National Memorial Cemetery of
the Pacific, by invitation of the director;
(3) The director of the department within the county of
Hawaii that is responsible for operating and
2025-2763 SB1377 CDl SMA.docx 2

Page 3 1377
S.B. NO.
S.D. 2
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
maintaining the county's veterans cemeteries, or the
director's designee;
(4) The director of the department within the county o£
Kauai that is responsible for operating and
maintaining the county's veterans cemeteries, or the
director's designee;
(5) The director of the department within the county of
Maui that is responsible for operating and maintaining
the county's veterans cemeteries, or the director's
designee; and
(6) The cemetery operations manager of the Hawaii state
veterans cemetery, or the manager's designee.
The members of the veterans cemeteries board shall serve
without compensation but may be reimbursed for necessary
expenses, including travel expenses, incurred in the performance
of their duties. A majority of the members of the veterans
cemeteries board shall constitute a quorum for the conduct of
the business of the board. A majority vote of the members
present at a meeting at which a quorum is established shall be
necessary to validate any action of the veterans cemeteries
board.
2025-2763 SB1377 CDl SMA.docx

Page 4 1377
S.B. NO
S.D. 2
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
(c) The veterans cemeteries board shall develop strategies
and make recommendations to meet compliance standards set by the
National Cemetery Administration of the United States Department
of Veterans Affairs. In developing the recommendations, the
veterans cemeteries board shall create, develop, and adopt a
statewide framework, which shall include:
(1) A clear understanding of the compliance standards for
cemetery grounds and maintenance set by the National
Cemetery Administration;
(2) Strategies and recommendations for grounds and
maintenance best practices to address the various
challenges and conditions of each cemetery location;
a^
(3) A standardized system of data collection and
information sharing to support the intergovernmental
efforts of the board.
(d) The office shall provide necessary staff and other
support required by the veterans cemeteries board for the
performance of its duties.
(e) The veterans cemeteries board shall submit a report of
the board's findings and recommendations, including any proposed
2025-2763 SB1377 CDl SMA.docx
llllllillllllHIMIillllllHIIR

Page 5
S.B. NO. K;
C.D. 1
legislation, to the legislature no later than twenty days prior
to the convening of each regular session."
SECTION 3. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2025-2763 SB1377 CDl SMA.docx 5
IIHIMMHIHIMNIIIIMIH

S.B. NO.
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 29th day of May .2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HA WAI'I

S.B. No. 1377, S.D. 2, H.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate


SB No. 1377, SD 2,HD1,CD1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives